Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB177.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Keystone Opportunity Dairy Zone Act.Section 102. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Dairy farmers are a vital, integral and irreplaceable part of the agricultural heritage of this Commonwealth.(2) Dairy farmers contribute to the continued economic health of this Commonwealth's agricultural sector, provide jobs and pay taxes, provide local and sustainable food products for nourishment and enjoyment and promote the preservation of farmland in the public interest of all residents of this Commonwealth.(3) The continued viability of dairy farming is in the best interest of the residents of this Commonwealth.20250HB0177PN0857 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) In light of continued economic forces and market pressures, the long-term viability of dairy farming requires coordinated efforts by private and public entities to ensure economic viability and ensure the continuation of the significant contributions dairy farmers make to the economic and social life of this Commonwealth.(5) The long-term economic viability of dairy farming requires the cooperative involvement of residents, businesses, State and local elected officials and community organizations.(6) It is in the best interest of this Commonwealth to assist and encourage the creation of zones to accomplish the purposes of this act.Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An individual or business that submits or intends to submit a zone application to the department."Business." An association, partnership, cooperative, corporation, sole proprietorship, limited liability company or employer."Dairy processing facility." A factory or plant directly and primarily involved in processing, refining or manufacturing raw milk that is at least 75% Pennsylvania milk or Pennsylvania milk products into milk, butter, milk powder, cheese, yogurt, ice cream, sour cream or a value-added dairy product intended for the wholesale or retail market."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth.20250HB0177PN0857 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Domicile." The place where an individual has a true and fixed home and principal establishment for an indefinite time and to which, whenever absent, that individual intends to return. Domicile continues until another place of domicile is established."Keystone opportunity dairy zone" or "zone." A defined geographic area comprised of one or more political subdivisions or portions of political subdivisions as designated by the department under section 301."Opportunity plan." A written plan that addresses the criteria and meets the requirements under section 302(a)(2)."Pennsylvania dairy farm." A farm that produces Pennsylvania milk."Pennsylvania milk." Raw milk produced by the milking of cows physically located on a farm within the geographic boundaries of this Commonwealth and certified as such by the Pennsylvania Milk Board."Pennsylvania milk product." A food or beverage made from or primarily made from at least 75% Pennsylvania milk, or a value-added dairy product, processed within this Commonwealth that utilized 75% or more Pennsylvania milk in its manufacture."Political subdivision." A county, city, borough, township, town or school district with taxing jurisdiction in a defined geographic area within this Commonwealth."Qualified business." A business authorized to do business in this Commonwealth that is located or partially located within a zone."Qualified political subdivision." A political subdivision that has real property within its jurisdiction that has been designated by the department as a zone.20250HB0177PN0857 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Resident." An individual who is domiciled and resides in an area that is designated a zone."Small scale dairy processing facility." A factory, plant or operation that exclusively utilizes Pennsylvania milk produced from a single Pennsylvania dairy farm with a total average herd size of 250 milking cows or fewer, or a combination of Pennsylvania dairy farms with a total collective average herd size of 250 milking cows or fewer, and that is directly and primarily involved in processing, refining or manufacturing raw Pennsylvania milk or Pennsylvania milk products into milk, butter, milk powder, cheese, yogurt, ice cream, sour cream or a value-added dairy product intended for the wholesale or retail market."Tax Reform Code of 1971." The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Value-added dairy product." Pennsylvania milk or a Pennsylvania milk product that has been additionally processed, improved, shredded, combined, aged, flavored, separated, condensed or otherwise prepared to provide additional value or convenience for the wholesale or retail market.CHAPTER 3KEYSTONE OPPORTUNITY DAIRY ZONESSection 301. Keystone opportunity dairy zones.(a) Establishment.--The department may designate up to 30 zones in accordance with this section, with up to 15 Class A zones and up to 20 Class B zones.(b) Zone authorization.--The department shall authorize not more than 30 zones in this Commonwealth. Individuals and businesses within an authorized zone that are qualified under this act shall be entitled to all tax exemptions, deductions, 20250HB0177PN0857 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 abatements or credits provided under this act for a period not to exceed 10 years beginning no sooner than one year from the effective date of this subsection and no later than three years from the effective date of this subsection. The department shall, upon approval, specify the precise beginning and ending dates for the tax exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits provided under this act.(c) Authorization for local tax exemption.--Every political subdivision within which a proposed zone is located, whether in whole or in part, is authorized to provide tax exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits to individuals and businesses qualified under this act. The political subdivision shall agree to provide exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits from all local taxes provided under this act in order to qualify to be designated a zone. The exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits shall be effective on the date determined by the department. The exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits shall be binding upon the political subdivision for the duration of the zone designation.(d) Authorization to extend duration of zone.--A zone may request to extend its designation for a period of three years. The request to extend a zone designation shall be made on a zone-by-zone basis. A qualified political subdivision having an approved zone within its jurisdiction and seeking to extend the zone designation shall pass the required ordinances, resolutions or other required action of the qualified political subdivision for the necessary exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits under this act, and shall submit copies of the ordinance, resolution or other action to the department. The department may grant the request to extend provided all the proper binding 20250HB0177PN0857 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ordinances, resolutions or other governing documents are passed by all qualified political subdivisions within the zone extending the necessary exemptions, deductions, abatements and credits to the entire zone. The department shall approve or deny the request for extension of duration of a subzone within 90 days of receipt and shall provide written notice, irrespective of whether approved or denied, to each qualified applicant, political subdivision, resident and qualified business affected. Upon approval of a request for extension of duration of a zone, the exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits shall be binding upon the qualified political subdivision as provided in subsection (c).Section 302. Application.(a) Initial application.--An applicant may apply to the department to designate a parcel as a zone. The application shall contain the following:(1) The geographic area of the proposed zone, including the specific political subdivision or subdivisions.(2) An opportunity plan, which shall include the following:(i) A detailed map of the proposed zone, including geographic boundaries, total area and present use and conditions of the land and structures of the proposed zone.(ii) Evidence of support from and participation of local government, school districts and other educational institutions, business groups, community organizations and the public.(iii) A detailed proposal outlining the proposed improvements in the zone, including, but not limited to, 20250HB0177PN0857 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proposed capital investment, job creation and increased dairy processing capacity for Pennsylvania milk or Pennsylvania milk products according to the specifications of this act.(iv) A description of anticipated activity in the proposed zone, including, but not limited to, site improvements.(v) Evidence of potential private and public investment in the proposed zone.(vi) The role of the proposed zone in economic development of the dairy industry in this Commonwealth and the anticipated impacts to dairy farmers producing Pennsylvania milk.(vii) Any other information deemed appropriate by the department or by the Secretary of Agriculture in consultation with the department.(3) The duration of the proposed zone, including the anticipated beginning and end date.(4) A formal, binding ordinance or resolution passed by every political subdivision in which the proposed zone is located that specifically provides for all local tax exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits for businesses provided in this act.(5) Evidence that the proposed zone meets the required criteria under this act.Section 303. Review.(a) Action of department.--The department, in consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture, shall review all completed applications submitted under section 302. An application for authorization as a zone must be received by a date to be 20250HB0177PN0857 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determined by the department in order to be considered by the department. The date to be determined by the department shall not be sooner than 120 days after the effective date of this subsection, nor later than two years after the effective date of this subsection.(b) Process.--The department shall authorize up to 30 zones from applications meeting the criteria under section 304 based upon need, likelihood of success, potential for increased dairy processing capacity and overall impact on the market for Pennsylvania milk or Pennsylvania milk products. The department may not alter the geographic boundaries of a zone described in an application unless mutually agreed upon between the department, the applicant and any affected local municipality. The department shall not deny an application due to an applicant's prior receipt of or consideration for any other State community and economic development program funding.(c) Authorizations.--Any zone approved shall be approved no later than three years after the effective date of this subsection.Section 304. Criteria for authorization of zone.(a) Class A zones.--(1) A class A zone shall:(i) Be not less than five acres, unless contiguous to or co-located with an existing or proposed dairy processing facility.(ii) Be not more than 150 acres.(2) In order to qualify for authorization as a class A zone under this section, an application shall:(i) Provide specific geographic information on the proposed zone location.20250HB0177PN0857 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Show anticipated private investment of $10 million or more in a dairy processing facility.(iii) Create 25 or more new jobs as defined by the department.(iv) Demonstrate an exceptional and meaningful opportunity for the expansion of dairy processing capacity within this Commonwealth.(b) Class B zones.--A class B zone shall:(1) Be not less than five acres, unless contiguous to or co-located with an existing or proposed dairy processing facility.(2) Be not more than 25 acres, unless co-located with a Pennsylvania dairy farm directly supplying Pennsylvania milk for an existing or proposed small-scale dairy processing facility.(3) In order to qualify for authorization as a class B zone under this section, an application shall:(i) Provide specific geographic information on the proposed zone location.(ii) Show anticipated private investment of $100,000 or more in a small-scale dairy processing facility.(iii) Demonstrate an exceptional and meaningful opportunity for the expansion of small-scale, boutique or locally based dairy processing capacity within this Commonwealth.Section 305. Zone limitations.A zone shall not encompass an entire political subdivision.Section 306. Residency.In order to qualify each year for a tax exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act, an individual shall be 20250HB0177PN0857 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 domiciled and shall reside in a zone for a period of 184 consecutive days during each taxable year.Section 307. Qualified businesses.In order to qualify each year for a tax exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act, a qualified business shall be incorporated under the laws of this Commonwealth and own or lease real property in a zone from which the qualified business actively operates a dairy processing facility or small scale dairy processing facility as certified by the department. The qualified business shall obtain annual renewal of the certification from the department to continue to qualify under this section. The following shall apply:(1) For a class A zone, the certification form shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(i) The duration of the zone designation.(ii) The number of jobs created.(iii) The number of jobs retained.(iv) The amount of capital investment.(v) The gross value of Pennsylvania milk products produced in the past year.(vi) The percentage of Pennsylvania milk utilized in the production of Pennsylvania milk products.(vii) Any other information, conditions or requirements reasonably required by the department.(2) For a class B zone, the certification form shall include all of the following:(i) The duration of the zone designation.(ii) The gross value of Pennsylvania milk products produced in the past year.(iii) Any other information, conditions or 20250HB0177PN0857 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements required by the department.Section 308. Forms.Applications for authorization as a zone shall be on forms prescribed by the department. The department shall make application forms available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website, or upon request by a potential applicant on paper forms or another method as determined by the department.CHAPTER 5STATE TAXESSUBCHAPTER AGENERAL PROVISIONSSection 501. State taxes.(a) Application.--An individual who is a resident of, or a qualified business located in, a zone shall receive the exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits as provided in this chapter and Chapter 7 for the duration of the zone designation. Exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits shall expire on the date of expiration of the zone.(b) Administration.--The Department of Revenue shall administer, construe and enforce the provisions of this chapter consistent with Articles II, III, IV, VI, VII, IX and XV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.SUBCHAPTER BPARTICULAR STATE TAXESSection 511. Sales and use tax.Sales at retail of services or tangible personal property, other than motor vehicles, to a qualified business or a construction contractor under a construction contract with a qualified business, landowner or lessee for the exclusive use, 20250HB0177PN0857 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consumption and utilization of the tangible personal property or service by the qualified business at the qualified business's, landowner's or lessee's facility located within a zone are exempt from the sales and use tax imposed under Article II of the Tax Reform Code of 1971. An exemption shall not be permitted for sales conducted prior to designation of the real property as part of a zone.Section 512. Personal income tax.(a) Exemption.--An individual shall be allowed an exemption from personal income tax for:(1) Compensation received during the time period when the individual was a resident of a zone.(2) Net income from the operation of a qualified business received by a resident or nonresident of a zone attributable to business activity conducted within a zone, determined in accordance with section 514, except that any business that operates both within and outside this Commonwealth, before computing its zone exemption, shall first determine its Pennsylvania activity over its activity everywhere by applying the three-factor apportionment formula as provided in Department of Revenue personal income tax regulations applicable to income apportionment in connection with a business, trade or profession carried on both within and outside this Commonwealth.(3) All of the following:(i) Net gains or income, less net losses, derived by a resident or nonresident of a zone from the sale, exchange or other disposition of real or tangible personal property located in a zone as determined in accordance with accepted accounting principles and 20250HB0177PN0857 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 practices. The exemption provided in this subparagraph shall not apply to the sale, exchange or other disposition of any stock of goods, merchandise or inventory or any operational assets unless the transfer is in connection with the sale, exchange or other disposition of all of the assets in complete liquidation of a qualified business located in a zone. This subparagraph shall apply to intangible personal property employed in a trade, profession or business in a zone, but only when transferred in connection with a sale, exchange or other disposition of all of the assets in complete liquidation of the qualified business in the zone.(ii) Net gains, less net losses, realized by a resident of a zone from the sale, exchange or disposition of intangible personal property or obligations issued on or after February 1, 1994, by the Commonwealth, a public authority, commission, board or other Commonwealth agency, political subdivision or authority created by a political subdivision or by the Federal Government as determined in accordance with accepted accounting principles and practices.(iii) The exemption from income for gain or loss provided for in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) shall be prorated based on the following:(A) In the case of gains, less net losses, in subparagraph (i), the percentage of time, based on calendar days, the property located in a zone was held by a resident or nonresident of the zone during the time period the zone was in effect in relation to 20250HB0177PN0857 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the total time the property was held.(B) In the case of gains, less net losses, in subparagraph (ii), the percentage of time, based on calendar days, the property was held by the taxpayer while a resident of a zone in relation to the total time the property was held.(4) Net gains or income derived from or in the form of rents received by an individual, whether a resident or nonresident of a zone, to the extent that income or loss from the rental of real or tangible personal property is allocable to a zone. For purposes of calculating this exemption:(i) Net rents derived from real or tangible personal property located in a zone are allocable to a zone.(ii) If the tangible personal property was used both within and without the zone during the taxable year, only the net income attributable to use in the zone is exempt. The net rental income shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days the property was used in the zone and the denominator of which is the total days of use.(5) Dividends received during the time the individual was a resident of a zone.(6) Interest received during the time period the individual was a resident of a zone.(b) Pass-through entities.--The exemptions provided for in subsection (a)(2), (3)(i) and (4) shall apply to all of the following:(1) The income or gain of a partnership or association. The partner or member shall be entitled to the exemptions under this section for the partner's or member's share, 20250HB0177PN0857 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 whether or not distributed, of the income or gain received by the partnership or association for its taxable year.(2) The income or gain of a Pennsylvania S corporation. The shareholder shall be entitled to the exemptions under this section for the shareholder's pro rata share, whether or not distributed, of the income or gain received by the corporation for its taxable year ending within or with the shareholder's taxable year.(c) Limitation.--A partnership, association, Subchapter S corporation, cooperative, resident or nonresident may not apply an exemption from income under this act for any class of income against any other classes of income or gain. A partnership, association, Subchapter S corporation, cooperative, resident or nonresident may not carry back or carry forward any exemption under this act from year to year. The credit allowed under this section shall not exceed the tax liability of the taxpayer under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for the tax year.Section 513. Residency considerations.If an individual completes the residency requirements under section 306 or if a nonresident realizes income attributable to business activity or property within a zone, the individual may claim the exemptions from income for the items provided under section 512 for that portion of the tax year that the individual was a resident or for that portion of the tax year during which the area is designated as a zone.Section 514. Corporate net income tax.(a) Credits.--For the tax years that begin on or after January 1, 2025, a corporation that is a qualified business under this act may claim a credit against the tax imposed by Article IV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for tax liability 20250HB0177PN0857 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 attributable to business activity conducted within the zone in the taxable year. A credit may not be claimed for activities conducted prior to designation of the real property as part of a zone. The business activity must be conducted directly by a corporation in the zone in order for the corporation to claim the tax credit.(b) Tax liability determinations.--The corporate tax liability attributable to business activity conducted within a zone shall be determined by multiplying the corporation's taxable income that is attributable to business activity conducted within the zone by the rate of tax imposed under Article IV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for the taxable year.(c) Determinations of attributable tax liability.--Tax liability attributable to business activity conducted within a zone shall be computed, construed, administered and enforced in conformity with Article IV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 and with specific reference to the following:(1) If the entire business of a corporation in this Commonwealth is transacted wholly within the zone, the taxable income attributable to business activity within a zone shall consist of the Pennsylvania taxable income as determined under Article IV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(2) If the entire business of a corporation in this Commonwealth is not transacted wholly within the zone, the taxable income of the corporation in a zone shall be determined upon the portion of the Pennsylvania taxable income of the corporation attributable to business activity conducted within the zone and apportioned in accordance with subsection (d).(d) Income apportionment.--The taxable income of a 20250HB0177PN0857 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 corporation that is a qualified business shall be apportioned to a zone by multiplying the Pennsylvania taxable income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor and the denominator of which is two, in accordance with the following:(1) The property factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the average value of the taxpayer's real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in the zone during the tax period and the denominator of which is the average value of all the taxpayer's real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in this Commonwealth during the tax period but shall not include the security interest of any corporation as seller or lessor in personal property sold or leased under a conditional sale, bailment lease, chattel mortgage or other contract providing for the retention of a lien or title as security for the sales price of the property.(2) (i) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total amount paid in the zone during the tax period by the taxpayer for compensation and the denominator of which is the total compensation paid in this Commonwealth during the tax period.(ii) Compensation is paid in the zone if:(A) the person's service is performed entirely within the zone;(B) the person's service is performed both within and without the zone, but the service performed without the zone is incidental to the person's service within the zone; or(C) some of the service is performed in the zone 20250HB0177PN0857 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and the base of operations or, if there is no base of operations, the place from which the service is directed or controlled is in the zone, or the base of operations or the place from which the service is directed or controlled is not in any location in which some part of the service is performed, but the individual's residence is in the zone.(e) Computation.--A corporation shall compute its Commonwealth taxable income in conformity with Article IV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 with no adjustments or subtractions for zone taxable income.(f) Limitation on amount of credit.--The credit allowed under this section shall not exceed the tax liability of a taxpayer under Article IV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for the tax year.(g) Credit not applicable to certain businesses.--The following shall apply:(1) Any portion of a taxpayer's taxable income that is attributable to the operation of any of the following may not be used to calculate a credit under this section:(i) A corporation that qualifies as a regulated investment company under Article IV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(ii) A holding company as defined in Article VI of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(2) The prohibition under paragraph (1) shall not apply to the portion of a qualified business engaged in manufacturing or processing.CHAPTER 7LOCAL TAXES20250HB0177PN0857 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 701. Local taxes.Every political subdivision in which a designated zone is located shall exempt, deduct, abate or credit local taxes in accordance with ordinances and resolutions adopted under section 301(c), as is applicable. Failure to exempt, deduct, abate or credit local taxes shall result in the revocation of the zone designation.Section 702. Real property tax.(a) Local rule.--Notwithstanding the act of May 22, 1933 (P.L.853, No.155), known as The General County Assessment Law, and 53 Pa.C.S. (relating to municipalities generally) each qualified political subdivision shall by ordinance or resolution abate 100% of the real property taxes on the assessed valuation of property in an area designated as a zone within this Commonwealth during the taxable years determined by the department. The real property tax abatement provided for in this section shall apply to all real property located in a zone, irrespective of the business activity, if any, made of the real property by its owner, when this act is in effect. An abatement may not be provided prior to designation of a zone by the department.(b) Interest and penalties.--If the department or a political subdivision finds that an individual or business claimed an abatement of real property tax to which the individual or business was not entitled under this act, the individual or business shall be liable for the abated taxes and subject to the applicable interest and penalty provisions provided by law.(c) Calculations for education subsidy for school districts.--In determining the market value of real property in 20250HB0177PN0857 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each school district, the State Tax Equalization Board shall exclude any increase in value above the base value prior to the effect of the abatement of local taxes to the extent and during the period of time that real estate tax revenues attributable to such increased value are not available to the school district for general school district purposes.Section 703. Local earned income and net profits taxes and business privilege taxes.(a) General exemption.--(1) If a qualified political subdivision has enacted any tax on the privilege of engaging in any business or profession, measured by gross receipts or on a flat rate basis, earned income or net profits, as defined in the act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as The Local Tax Enabling Act, imposed within the boundaries of a zone, the qualified political subdivision shall exempt from the imposition or operation of the local tax ordinances, statutes, regulations or otherwise:(i) The business gross receipts for operations conducted by a qualified business within a zone.(ii) The earned income received by a resident of a zone.(iii) The net profits of a qualified business attributable to business activity conducted within a zone when imposed by the qualified political subdivision where that qualified business is located.(2) An exemption may not be granted for operations conducted for earned income received or for activities conducted prior to designation of the real property as part of a zone.20250HB0177PN0857 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Additional exemptions.--(1) Paragraph (2) shall apply if a qualified political subdivision has enacted a tax on the privilege of engaging in a profession or business, on wages or compensation, on net profits from the operation of a business or profession or other activity or on the occupancy or use of real property under any of the following:(i) The act of August 5, 1932 (Sp.Sess. P.L.45, No.45), referred to as the Sterling Act.(ii) The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(iii) The act of August 24, 1961 (P.L.1135, No.508), referred to as the First Class A School District Earned Income Tax Act.(iv) The act of August 9, 1963 (P.L.640, No.338), entitled "An act empowering cities of the first class, coterminous with school districts of the first class, to authorize the boards of public education of such school districts to impose certain additional taxes for school district purposes, and providing for the levy, assessment and collection of such taxes."(v) The act of May 30, 1984 (P.L.345, No.69), known as the First Class City Business Tax Reform Act.(vi) The act of June 5, 1991 (P.L.9, No.6), known as the Pennsylvania Intergovernmental Cooperation Authority Act for Cities of the First Class.(2) If there is an enactment under paragraph (1), the qualified political subdivision shall provide an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit from the imposition and operation of the local tax ordinance or resolution for all of 20250HB0177PN0857 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the following:(i) The privilege of engaging in a business or profession within a zone by an individual or qualified business, whether a resident or nonresident of the zone.(ii) Salaries, wages, commissions, compensation or other income received for services rendered or work performed by a resident of a zone.(iii) The gross or net income or gross or net profits realized from the operation of a qualified business to the extent attributable to business activity conducted within a zone.(iv) The occupancy or use of real property located within the zone.(c) Calculation for education subsidy for school district.--In determining the personal income valuation of a school district, the Secretary of Revenue shall exclude any increase in the valuation as defined in section 2501(9.1) of the Public School Code of 1949, above the base value prior to the abatement of local taxes in a zone located within the school district to the extent and during the period of time that personal income revenues attributable to the increase in the personal income valuation are not available to the school district for general school district purposes. An exemption under this section may not be granted to an individual or qualified business prior to designation of the real property as part of a zone.(d) Determination of exemption.--For the purposes of determining an exemption under this section, a tax on or measured by any of the following shall be attributed to business activity conducted within a zone by applying the apportionment factors under section 514(d):20250HB0177PN0857 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Business gross receipts.(2) Gross or net income.(3) Gross or net profits.Section 704. Mercantile license tax.An individual or qualified business in a zone shall not be required to pay any fee authorized pursuant to a mercantile license tax imposed under the act of June 20, 1947 (P.L.745, No.320), entitled "An act to provide revenue for school districts of the first class A by imposing a temporary mercantile license tax on persons engaging in certain occupations and businesses therein; providing for its levy and collection; for the issuance of mercantile licenses upon the payment of fees therefor; conferring and imposing powers and duties on boards of public education, receivers of school taxes and school treasurers in such districts; saving certain ordinances of council of certain cities, and providing compensation for certain officers, and employes and imposing penalties."Section 705. Local sales and use tax.(a) Exemption.--A political subdivision shall exempt sales at retail of services or tangible personal property, except motor vehicles, to a qualified business or a construction contractor under a construction contract with a qualified business, landowner or lessee for the exclusive use, consumption and utilization of the tangible personal property or service by the qualified business at the qualified business's, landowner's or lessee's facility located within a zone from a city or county tax on purchase price authorized under Article XXXI-B of the act of July 28, 1953 (P.L.723, No.230), known as the Second Class County Code and the act of June 5, 1991 (P.L.9, No.6), known as 20250HB0177PN0857 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Pennsylvania Intergovernmental Cooperation Authority Act for Cities of the First Class. An exemption may not be granted for sales occurring prior to designation of the real property as part of a zone.(b) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "sales at retail of services or tangible personal property" shall be as specified under Article II of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.CHAPTER 9ADMINISTRATION OF TAX PROVISIONSSection 901. Transferability.Any exemption, deduction, abatement or credit provided to any individual or qualified business under Chapter 5 or 7 is nontransferable and cannot be applied, used or assigned to any other individual, business or tax account.Section 902. Recapture.(a) Refund.--If any qualified business located within a zone has received an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act and subsequently relocates outside of the zone within the first nine years of locating in a zone, the qualified business shall refund to the State and political subdivision that granted the exemption, deduction, abatement or credit received in accordance with the following:(1) If a qualified business relocates within five years from the date of first locating in a zone, 66% of all the exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits attributed to that qualified business's participation in the zone shall be refunded to the Commonwealth and the political subdivision.(2) If a qualified business relocates within five to nine years from the date of first locating in a zone, 33% of all exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits attributed 20250HB0177PN0857 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to that qualified business's participation in the zone shall be refunded to the Commonwealth and the political subdivision.(b) Waiver.--The department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, the Secretary of Agriculture and the political subdivision, may waive or modify recapture requirements under this section if the department determines that the business relocation was due to circumstances beyond the control of the business, including, but not limited to:(1) natural disaster;(2) unforeseen industry trends; or(3) loss of a major supplier or market.Section 903. Delinquent or deficient State or local taxes.(a) Individuals.--An individual may not claim or receive an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act unless that individual is in full compliance with all State and local tax laws, ordinances and resolutions.(b) Qualified business.--(1) A qualified business may not claim or receive an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act unless that qualified business is in full compliance with all State and local tax laws, ordinances and resolutions.(2) A qualified business may not claim or receive an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act if any individual or business with a 20% or greater interest in that qualified business is not in full compliance with all State and local tax laws, ordinances and resolutions.(c) Later compliance and eligibility.--An individual or qualified business that is not eligible to claim an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit due to noncompliance with any 20250HB0177PN0857 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State or local tax law may become eligible if that individual or qualified business subsequently comes into full compliance with all State and local tax laws to the satisfaction of the Department of Revenue or the political subdivision within the calendar year in which the noncompliance first occurred. If full compliance is not attained by February 5 of the calendar year following the calendar year during which noncompliance first occurred, that individual or qualified business is precluded from claiming any exemption, deduction, abatement or credit for that calendar year, whether or not full compliance is achieved subsequently.Section 904. Code compliance.(a) Applicability.--An individual or qualified business shall be precluded from claiming an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit provided under this act if the individual or qualified business owns real property in a zone and the real property is not in compliance with all applicable State and local zoning, building and housing laws, ordinances or codes.(b) Opportunity to achieve compliance.--An individual or qualified business who is not in compliance under subsection (a) shall have until December 31 of the calendar year following designation of the real property as part of a zone to be in compliance in order to claim any State exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits for that year. If full compliance is not attained by December 31 of that calendar year, the individual or qualified business is precluded from claiming any exemption, deduction or credit for that calendar year, whether or not compliance is achieved in a subsequent calendar year. The political subdivision may extend the time period in which an individual or qualified business must come into compliance with 20250HB0177PN0857 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a local ordinance or building code for a period not to exceed one year if the political subdivision determines that the individual or qualified business has made and shall continue to make a good faith effort to come into compliance and that an extension will enable the individual or qualified business to achieve full compliance. A qualified political subdivision is required to notify the Department of Revenue in writing of all individuals or qualified businesses not in compliance with this subsection within 30 days following the end of each calendar year.Section 905. Appeals.An individual or qualified business shall be deemed to be in compliance with any State or local tax for purposes of this section if that individual or qualified business had made a timely administrative or judicial appeal for that particular tax or has entered into and is in compliance with a duly authorized deferred payment plan with the Department of Revenue or political subdivision for that particular tax.Section 906. Notice requirements.(a) Requirement.--After compliance reviews have been conducted by appropriate Commonwealth and local authorities, the department shall notify each zone applicant by regular mail each year of the department's approval or denial of the applicant's zone application. No zone is entitled to any tax benefits unless it receives approval from the department.(b) Transmittal.--The department or its designated official shall, within 15 business days of receipt of a zone application made under this act, forward a copy of the application to the Department of Revenue, the Secretary of Agriculture, the Pennsylvania Milk Board and any other appropriate Commonwealth 20250HB0177PN0857 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and local authorities for review and processing.Section 907. Application time.(a) Requirement.--Except as provided under subsection (b), an applicant shall file an application in a manner prescribed by the department by December 31 of each calendar year for which the applicant claims any exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act.(b) Extension or waiver.--Upon request of the applicant, the department may extend or waive the application deadline for good cause shown if the political subdivision does not object to the waiver or extension.(c) Approval.--An exemption, deduction, abatement or credit may not be claimed or received for that calendar year until approval has been granted by the department.CHAPTER 11PROCEDURES FOR ZONESSection 1101. Keystone opportunity dairy zone prioritizations.(a) Reduced interest.--Projects in a zone that is approved for Pennsylvania Industrial Development Authority or Small Business First financing shall receive the lowest interest rate extended to borrowers.(b) Priority consideration.--Projects in a zone shall receive priority consideration for State assistance under State community and economic development programs and for necessary approval required from the Department of Environmental Protection.(c) Local governments.--The department shall provide technical assistance to political subdivisions relating to taxation, implementation of the opportunity plan, establishing annual benchmarks and annual reporting requirements.20250HB0177PN0857 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1102. Reporting.The department shall report every four years to the General Assembly on the economic effects of this act in each zone.Section 1103. Other Commonwealth tax credits.(a) Entitled to claim credit.--An individual or qualified business that is entitled to claim an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit in accordance with the provisions of this act shall not be entitled to claim or accumulate any of the following exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits that it may otherwise have qualified for due to activity in the zone:(i) under the Tax Reform Code of 1971:(A) a research and development tax credit under Article XVII-B; or(B) a neighborhood assistance tax credit under Article XIX-A;(ii) a job creation tax credit under the act of June 29, 1996 (P.L.434, No.67), known as the Job Enhancement Act.(b) Application to income.--The individual or qualified business may apply the exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits to income realized from activity or transactions outside the zone, but only for the taxable year to which the exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits apply. The provisions of this section shall apply only to the taxes provided in Chapters 5 and 7.Section 1104. Monitoring data.In addition to any other requirements of this act, the department shall monitor all of the following:(1) Verifiable job creation and job retention data.(2) Information on the types of jobs created and average hourly wages.20250HB0177PN0857 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The number of years in the zone.(4) Annual, unduplicated public and private capital investment amounts.(5) A description of dairy processing activities.(6) Types and amounts of other economic development assistance received from the department, if any.CHAPTER 13MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 1301. Illegal activity.Any funds or other forms of consideration received by an individual or qualified business conducting any type of illegal activity shall not be eligible for any of the exemptions, deductions, abatements and credits or any other benefits that are created under this act.Section 1302. Rules and regulations.The department, Department of Revenue and Department of Agriculture may promulgate regulations necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act.Section 1303. Compliance.An individual or qualified business eligible for an exemption, deduction or credit under this act shall comply with all reporting, filing and compliance requirements under the Tax Reform Code of 1971 unless otherwise provided for in this act.Section 1304. Penalties.(a) Civil penalty.--(1) In addition to any penalties authorized by the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for violations of that act, the Department of Revenue may impose an additional administrative penalty not to exceed $50,000 for any act or violation of this act relating to State and local taxes, including the 20250HB0177PN0857 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 filing of any false statement, return or document.(2) The department may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $50,000 for a violation of this act, including the filing of any false statement, return or document.(b) Criminal penalty.--In addition to any criminal penalty under the Tax Reform Code of 1971, any individual or qualified business who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this act commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 1305. Construction.This act shall be interpreted to ensure that all provisions relating to State and local tax exemptions, deductions, abatements and credits are strictly construed in favor of the Commonwealth.Section 1306. Severability.The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application to any individual or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 1307. Repeals.All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 1308. Applicability.The provisions of this act shall be applied prospectively. An individual or business may not claim any exemption, deduction, abatement or credit until the individual or business becomes qualified under this act and, in the case of a business, receives certification from the department that the business is qualified.Section 1309. Effective date.20250HB0177PN0857 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0177PN0857 - 34 - 1